Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Print Media Advertisement Requirements.

§ 24.2-956.
Requirements for print media advertisements sponsored by a candidate campaign committee.

It shall be unlawful for any candidate or candidate campaign committee to sponsor a print media advertisement that constitutes an expenditure or contribution required to be disclosed under Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) unless all of the following conditions are met:

It bears the legend or includes the statement: “Paid for by [Name of candidate or campaign committee as it appears in the statement of organization].” Alternatively, if the advertisement is supporting a candidate who is the sponsor and the advertisement makes no reference to any other clearly identified candidate, then the statement “Paid for by [Name of candidate]” may be replaced by the statement “Authorized by [Name of candidate].”

Click to view

In an advertisement sponsored by a candidate or a candidate campaign committee that makes reference to any other clearly identified candidate who is not sponsoring the advertisement, the sponsor shall state whether it is authorized by the candidate not sponsoring the advertisement. The visual legend in the advertisement shall state either “Authorized by [Name of candidate], candidate for [Name of office]” or “Not authorized by any other candidate.” This subdivision does not apply if the sponsor of the advertisement is the candidate the advertisement supports or that candidate’s campaign committee.

If an advertisement is jointly sponsored, the disclosure statement shall name all the sponsors.

(Effective until January 1, 2024) Any disclosure statement required by this section shall be displayed in a conspicuous manner in a minimum font size of seven point. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate standards for meeting the requirements of this subdivision.

Any print media advertisement appearing in electronic format shall display the disclosure statement in a minimum font size of seven point; however, if the advertisement lacks sufficient space for a disclosure statement in a minimum font size of seven point, the advertisement may meet disclosure requirements if, by clicking on the print media advertisement appearing in electronic format, the viewer is taken to a landing page or a home page that displays the disclosure statement in a conspicuous manner.

4.

(Effective January 1, 2024)

Any disclosure statement required by this section shall be displayed in a conspicuous manner in a font size proportionate to the size of the advertisement. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate standards for meeting the requirements of this subdivision.

History.

2002, c. 487, § 24.2-943; 2003, c. 237; 2004, cc. 55, 457; 2005, c. 369; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2012, c. 519; 2020, cc. 557, 615.

Subdivision 4 set out twice.

The first version of subdivision 4 is effective until January 1, 2024. The second version of subdivision 4 is effective January 1, 2024.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act no later than July 1, 2021, with enforcement of such regulations delayed until January 1, 2024. Upon promulgation, such regulations shall be included in the provisions of law summarized by the State Board pursuant to subsection A of §

24.2-946

.”

Acts 2020, c. 557, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act affecting regulants shall become effective January 1, 2024.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that this clause refers only to the first sentence in subdivision 4.

Acts 2020, c. 557, cl. 4 provides: “That print media advertisements paid for or distributed prior to July 1, 2024, shall not be subject to the regulations promulgated by the State Board of Elections pursuant to this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 615, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 615, cl. 3 provides: “That print media advertisements paid for or distributed prior to the effective date of this act shall not be subject to the provisions of this act [January 1, 2021].”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 519 added “in a minimum font size of seven point” at the end of subdivision 4; and added subdivision 5.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 557 added the second sentence in subdivision 4.

The 2020 amendment by c. 557, effective January 1, 2024, substituted “font size proportionate to the size of the advertisement” for “minimum font size of seven point” in the first sentence added the second sentence in subdivision 4.

The 2020 amendment by c. 615, effective January 1, 2021, in subdivision 1, inserted “as it appears on the statement of organization” in the first sentence and substituted “Name of candidate” for “Name of sponsor” twice in the final sentence.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

§ 24.2-956.1.
Requirements for print media advertisements sponsored by a person or political committee, other than a candidate campaign committee.

It shall be unlawful for any person or political committee to sponsor a print media advertisement that constitutes an expenditure or contribution required to be disclosed under Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) unless the following requirements are met:

It bears the legend or includes the statement: “Paid for by [Name of person or political committee].”

Click to view

In an advertisement supporting or opposing the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates, the sponsor states whether it is authorized by a candidate. The visual legend in the advertisement shall state either “Authorized by [Name of candidate], candidate for [Name of office]” or “Not authorized by a candidate.”

In an advertisement that identifies a candidate the sponsor is opposing, the sponsor must disclose in the advertisement the name of the candidate who is intended to benefit from the advertisement, if the sponsor coordinates with, or has the authorization of, the benefited candidate.

If an advertisement is jointly sponsored, the disclosure statement shall name all the sponsors.

(Effective until January 1, 2024) Any disclosure statement required by this section shall be displayed in a conspicuous manner in a minimum font size of seven point. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate standards for meeting the requirements of this subdivision.

Any print media advertisement appearing in electronic format shall display the disclosure statement in a minimum font size of seven point; however, if the advertisement lacks sufficient space for a disclosure statement in a minimum font size of seven point, the advertisement may meet disclosure requirements if, by clicking on the print media advertisement appearing in electronic format, the viewer is taken to a landing page or a home page that displays the disclosure statement in a conspicuous manner.

5.

(Effective January 1, 2024)

Any disclosure statement required by this section shall be displayed in a conspicuous manner in a font size proportionate to the size of the advertisement. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate standards for meeting the requirements of this subdivision.

History.

2002, c. 487, § 24.2-943; 2003, c. 237; 2004, cc. 55, 457; 2005, c. 369; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2012, c. 519; 2020, c. 557.

Subdivision 5 set out twice.

The first version of subdivision 5 is effective until January 1, 2024. The second version of subdivision 4 is effective until January 1, 2024.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 791 and 802 amended § 24.2-943, from which this section is derived.

Acts 2020, c. 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act no later than July 1, 2021, with enforcement of such regulations delayed until January 1, 2024. Upon promulgation, such regulations shall be included in the provisions of law summarized by the State Board pursuant to subsection A of §

24.2-946

.”

Acts 2020, c. 557, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act affecting regulants shall become effective January 1, 2024.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that this clause refers only to the first sentence in subdivision 5.

Acts 2020, c. 557, cl. 4 provides: “That print media advertisements paid for or distributed prior to July 1, 2024, shall not be subject to the regulations promulgated by the State Board of Elections pursuant to this act.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 519 added “in a minimum font size of seven point” at the end of subdivision 5; and added subdivision 6.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 557 added the second sentence in subdivision 5.

The 2020 amendment by c. 557, effective January 1, 2024, substituted “font size proportionate to the size of the advertisement” for “minimum font size of seven point” in the first sentence in subdivision 5.